Utah statutes.
19-6-719.   Used oil collection account.
There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the Used
Oil Collection Administration Account. All money received by the state from
the recycling fee placed on lubricating oil under this part, all permit fees,
all penalties imposed under this part, and all money received as a grant or
donation to be used for the administration of this part shall be placed in
this account to be appropriated to the division for the management of DIYer
used oil under this part subject to the priorities in Section 19-6-720.
